Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska42-704.01
Application of act to resident of foreign country and foreign support proceeding.

(a) A tribunal of this state shall apply sections 42-701 to 42-747.04 and, as applicable, sections 42-748.01 to 42-748.13, to a support proceeding involving:

(i) A foreign support order;

(ii) A foreign tribunal; or

(iii) An obligee, obligor, or child residing in a foreign country.

(b) A tribunal of this state that is requested to recognize and enforce a support order on the basis of comity may apply the procedural and substantive provisions of sections 42-701 to 42-747.04.

(c) Sections 42-748.01 to 42-748.13 apply only to a support proceeding under the Convention. In such a proceeding, if a provision of such sections is inconsistent with sections 42-701 to 42-747.04, sections 42-748.01 to 42-748.13 control.

Laws 2015, LB415, § 5.